Utah statutes.
59-9-102.   Offsets.
(1)  If any authorized insurer doing business in this state during the tax
year pays a property tax in this state, the insurer may deduct from the tax
provided under this chapter that portion of the property tax paid for general
state purposes.
(2)  Any domestic insurance company paying a fee for examination under Section
31A-2-205 may deduct from the tax provided under this chapter the amount of
the examination fee paid, subject to the limitations of Subsection
31A-2-203(2)(e).
(3)  There is offset against the taxes imposed under Section 59-9-101 the
amount of any assessments paid by an insurance company under the guaranty
associations established under Title 31A, Chapter 28, Guaranty Associations,
in the manner provided by Sections 31A-28-113 and 31A-28-212.
(4)  There is an offset provided in Section 59-9-102.5 against the premium
assessment imposed under Subsection 59-9-101(2) against an admitted insurer
writing workers' compensation insurance in this state.
(5)  The state has no liability to insurers for any amount by which offsets
allowed under this section exceed the insurer's premium tax liability.
